th: ปลายหัวประแจ: หกเหลี่ยม; หัวห้าแฉก; หัวฟิลลิปส์; หัวโพซีไดรฟ์; เจาะรู; หัวสแปนเนอร์; หัวสปลายน์; ทรงเหลี่ยม; หัวทอล์ค; หัวดาว; หัวไทรวิง; หัว 12 จุด; อื่นๆ
cs: Špička klíče nástroje: Šestihran; Pentalobe; Phillips; Pozidriv; Drážkované; Klíč; Spline klíč; Čtvercová; Sada hrotů Torq; Torx; Trojkřídlý; Dvanáctibodový; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrh ključa za alat: Heksagonalni; Pentalobe; Križni; Pozidriv; S utorima; Za matice; Ožlijebljeni; Kvadratni; Torq-set; Torx; Trokraki; Dvanaest točaka; Ostalo
ru: Наконечник ключа инструмента: Шестигранный; Pentalobe; Крестовая; Pozidriv; Шлицевая; Гаечный ключ; Шлицевая с головкой под торцевой ключ; Квадратный; Torq-набор; Звездочка; Трехкрылый; Двенадцатиточечный; Другой
ko: 도구 주요 팁: 육각; 펜탈로브; Phillips; Pozidriv; 슬롯형; 스패너; 스플라인; 스퀘어; 토크 세트; 톡스; 트라이윙; 12점식; 기타
bg-BG: Накрайник на ключ на инструмента: Шестостен; Пенталоб; Филипс; Pozidriv; С нарези; Гаечен ключ; Шпонка; Квадрат; Настройка на въртящия момент; Torx; Трикрил; Twelve-point; Други
sl-SI: Konica ključa za orodje: Šestoglati; Pentalobe; Križni; Pozidriv; Ploščati; Vijačni ključ; Spline; Kvadraten; Torq-set; Torx; Trikrilni; 12-kotni; Drugo
de: Werkzeugschlüsselspitze: Sechskant; Pentalob; Phillips; Pozidriv; Geschlitzt; Schlüssel; Spline; Quadrat; Torq-Set; Torx; Tri-Wing; 12-Punkt; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 多功能鑰匙末端: 六角; 五角形; 十字; 米字; 開槽式; 扳手; 花鍵; 方頭; Torq-set; 梅花形; 三翼; 十二點式; 其他
sv: Nyckelverktygsspets: Hex; Pentalobe; Phillips; Pozidriv; Slitsad; Nyckel; Spline; Fyrkantig; Torq-set; Torx; Trevingad; Tolv punkter; Övrigt
fr: Embout de clé de l’outil: Hexagonal; Pentalobe; Phillips; Pozidriv; Fendu; Serrage; Cannelée; Carré; Jeu de couple; Torx; Trois ailettes; Douze pointes; Autre
en: Tool key tip: Hex; Pentalobe; Phillips; Pozidriv; Slotted; Spanner; Spline; Square; Torq-set; Torx; Tri-wing; Twelve-point; Other
ro-RO: Vârf cheie pentru scule: Hexagonală; Pentalobe; Phillips; Pozidriv; Despicat; Cheie de buloane; Cu caneluri; Pătrat; Torq-set; Torx; Trei aripi; Douăsprezece puncte; Altele
fi: Työkaluavaimen kärki: Kuusikulmio; Pentalobe; Phillips; Pozidriv; Uritettu; Kiintoavain; Kiila; Neliömäinen; Torq-sarja; Torx; Kolmisiipinen; 12-pisteinen; Muu
ja: 工具開閉キーの先端: 六角; ペンタローブ; プラス; ポジドライブ; スロット付き; スパナ; スプライン; スクエア; トルク設定; トルクス; トライウィング; 12角; その他
vi: Đầu phím công cụ: Lục giác; Vít Pentalobe; Phillips; Pozidriv; Có lỗ; Cờ lê; Hàm nối trục; Mũi giày vuông; Bộ mô-men xoắn; Vít Torx; Tua vít ba cánh; Mười hai điểm; Khác
sk-SK: Špička kľúča nástroja: Prírubový inbusový; Pentalobe; Krížový; Pozidriv; Štrbinový; Kľúč; Nástrčný; Hranatý; Krídlový; Torx; Trojkrídlo; Dvanásťbodový; Iné
hu: Szerszámkulcs hegye: Hatlapú; Pentalobe; Phillips; Pozidriv; Réselt; Villáskulcs; Hornyos; Négyzet; Torq-készlet; Torx; Háromszárnyú; Tizenkét pontos; Egyéb
nb: Verktøynøkkeltips: Sekskant; Pentalobe; Phillips; Pozidriv; Spaltet; Fastnøkkel; Spline; Firkantet; Torq-sett; Torx; Tri-wing; Tolvpunkt; Annet
es: Punta de llave de herramienta: Hexagonal; Pentalobular; Phillips; Pozidriv; Ranurado; Horquilla; Estrías; Cuadrado; Torq-set; Torx; Tri-wing; Doce puntas; Otros
pt-BR: Ponta da chave de ferramenta: Hexadecimal; Pentalobe; Phillips; Pozidriv; Perfurado; Chave inglesa; Chaveta; Quadrado; Conjunto de torque; Torx; Três pontas; Doze pontos; Outro
zh-CN: 刀尖: 六边形; 五角螺丝; 十字螺丝; 波兹德瑞夫螺丝; 开槽; 扳手; 花键; 方形; 扭矩设定螺丝; 六角星形螺丝; 三角翼螺丝; 十二点螺丝; 其他
lt-LT: Įrankių veržliarakčio antgalis: Šešiabriaunis; „Pentalobe“ tipo; Kryžminis; „Pozidriv“; Karūnėlės tipo; Veržliaraktis; Išdrožinis; Kvadratinis; „Torq-set“; „Torx“; Trijų sparnelių; Dvylikos taškų; Kita
pt-PT: Ponta de chave de ferramenta: Hexagonal; Pentalobe; Phillips; Pozidriv; Com ranhura; Chave inglesa; Estriada; Quadrado; Conjunto de torque; Torx; Tri-wing; Doze pontos; Outro
nl: Tip gereedschapssleutel: Zeskant; Pentalobe; Phillips; Pozidriv; Sleuven; Spanner; Spiebaan; Vierkant; Torq-Set; Torx; Tri-wing; Twaalfpunts; Andere
pl: Końcówka klucza: Klątwa; Pentalob; Phillips; Pozidriv; Wpustowy; Klucz do nakrętek; Klin; Kwadrat; Zestaw Torq; Torx; Trójskrzydłowe; Dwunastopunktowy; Inne
da: Værktøjsnøglespids: Hex; Pentalobe; Phillips; Pozidriv; Slidset; Nøgle; Spline; Firkant; Torq-sæt; Torx; Trefløjet; Tolv-punkts; Andet
el: Άκρο κλειδιού (εργαλείου): Μπουλόνι; Πεντάλοβος; Phillips; Pozidriv; Σχισμοειδές; Αγγλικό κλειδί; Spline; Τετράγωνο; Torq-set; Torx; Τρίπτερο; Δώδεκα σημεία; Άλλο
it: Suggerimento per l’attrezzo: Esagonale; Pentalobe; Phillips; Pozidriv; A fessura; Chiave inglese; Scanalatura; Quadrato; Torq-set; Torx; Tre punte; Dodici punti; Altro
tr: Araç anahtarı ucu: Altıgen; Pentalop; Phillips; Pozidriv; Oluklu; Anahtarı; Kama; Kare; Tork ayarı; Torx; Üç kanatlı; On iki noktalı; Diğer